Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 10. Soil and Water Conservation.

Collateral references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agriculture, §§ 7, 24, 25, 36.

3 C.J.S., Agriculture, §§ 2, 7-9.

Measure of damages for wrongful removal of earth, sand, or gravel from land. 1 ALR3d 801.

Prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, minerals, soil, or other natural products within municipal limits. 10 ALR3d 1226.

Liability for diversion of surface water by raising surface level of land. 88 ALR4th 891.

Sec. 41.10.010.
Declaration of policy.

The farm, forest, and grazing land of the state is a basic asset of the state.
It is the policy of this chapter, in the interest of the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of the state, to provide for the development, use, and conservation of this land in accordance with its capabilities.

History.

(§ 47-4-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 41.10.020.
Creation and boundaries of soil conservation district. [Repealed, § 14, ch 69 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 41.10.030.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the orderly development of land, for guiding settlement, and for conserving soil and water and soil resources and controlling and preventing soil erosion.

History.

(§ 47-4-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.040.
Natural Resource Conservation and Development Board.

The Alaska Natural Resource Conservation and Development Board is composed of five members. The commissioner or, in the absence of the commissioner, the director of agriculture, serves ex officio but without a vote on the board.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1996)

Sec. 41.10.045.
Executive director.

The commissioner shall appoint an executive director and clerical staff to assist the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.050.
Appointment.

The governor shall appoint members of the board subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960)

Sec. 41.10.060.
Qualifications of board members.

Members of the board shall be resident bona fide users of land selected from the five major land areas of the state.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.065.
Major land areas of the state.

The five major land areas of the state are:

the Arctic and northwest Alaska;

the Yukon and Tanana Valleys;

southwest Alaska and the Kenai Peninsula;

southcentral Alaska; and

southeast Alaska.

History.

(§ 5 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.070.
Term of office.

The term of office of members is three years.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.075.
Board meetings.

The board shall hold one regular meeting annually at the state capital and one or more additional meetings at a time and place in the state selected by the board.

History.

(§ 7 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.080.
Vacancies.

The governor shall fill vacancies by appointment for the unexpired term.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960)

Sec. 41.10.090.
Compensation and per diem.

Members receive no salary but receive the same per diem and travel expenses authorized for members of state boards.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 41.10.100.
Duties of board.

At the request of the commissioner, the board shall meet and advise the commissioner in the exercise of the powers, duties, and functions of the commissioner.

The board shall also

receive and review reports concerning the use of soil resources of the state;

hold public hearings and meetings to determine whether land in the state is being used in a manner consistent with sound soil and water conservation practices;

make recommendations for specific action necessary to provide for the effective and orderly development of agricultural, forest, and grazing land in the state;

review an appeal by an applicant or lessee from a decision of the director of the division of lands concerning a sale or lease of state agricultural or grazing land and submit its recommendations to the commissioner or hearing officer;

act in an advisory capacity to the soil and water conservation districts in the state;

act in an advisory capacity to the commissioner and director of the division of the department with responsibility for agriculture in the review of farm conservation plans for all state agricultural land sales in the state.

History.

(§ 47-4-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1960; am §§ 8, 9 ch 69 SLA 1983; am § 88 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 18 ch 22 SLA 2001; am § 51 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b)(6), added “the department with responsibility for” following “director of the division of”.

Sec. 41.10.110.
Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power to

conduct land capability surveys and investigations of potential agricultural areas and of soil conservation and erosion control, including necessary preventative and control measures, in the state; to publish the results of these surveys and investigations and to disseminate information concerning the results of the surveys and investigations to prospective settlers and the general public;

make technical guidance and other assistance available to settlers of new land to assure the development of the land in a manner that will permit it to be used in accordance with its capabilities and treated in accordance with its needs;

carry out measures for soil conservation and erosion control within the state, including engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, and changes in use of land, with the consent and cooperation of the land user or agency having jurisdiction of the land;

cooperate with, furnish assistance to, and enter into agreements with, a user of land or agency within the state;

construct, improve, and maintain soil erosion control and conservation structures as are necessary and practical for carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of soil and control of soil erosion within the state, cropping programs, tillage practices and changes in land use, and publish plans and information and bring them to the attention of users of land within the state;

accept contributions in money, services, materials, or equipment from the United States or its agencies, from an agency of the state, and from any other source, for use in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 47-4-5(1 — 7) ACLA 1949; am §§ 2, 3 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.120.
Approval of land user.

A survey, investigation or plan for land may not be undertaken by the commissioner and measures for soil conservation and erosion control may not be carried out without the prior approval of the user of the land.

History.

(§ 47-4-5(8) ACLA 1949; am § 11 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.130.
Creation and boundaries of soil and water conservation districts.

The commissioner may, on the recommendation of the board, create soil and water conservation districts in the state upon petition signed by 25 or more land users setting out the proposed boundaries of the proposed district. The commissioner shall fix a time for and give notice of a public hearing based on the petition at a convenient location or locations within the boundaries of the proposed district. The commissioner may fix the boundaries of the district created, supervise the election of, prescribe the duties of, and install a governing body of five land users to be known as district supervisors for each district created, and delegate to the district supervisors powers as the commissioner considers necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter within the district boundaries.

The area of the state that is not located within a district organized under (a) of this section shall be governed by the board.

History.

(§ 47-4-5(9) ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 69 SLA 1983)

Sec. 41.10.140.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Alaska Natural Resource Conservation and Development Board;

“land user” or “user of land” means a person who

is a producer of renewable resources, including farming and forestry; and

has a current cooperative agreement with a soil and water conservation district.

History.

(§ 47-4-5(9) ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 69 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For additional definitions, see AS

41.99.900

.

Sec. 41.10.150.
Short title. [Repealed, § 14 ch 69 SLA 1983.]